District of Columbia statutes.
1-911.03

Alienation of benefits.

Benefits of the retirement programs provided for in this chapter shall not be assigned or alienated, except to the extent expressly permitted by this chapter or by another applicable law and with respect to a domestic relations order that substantially meets all of the requirements of section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code , as determined solely by the Retirement Board.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 203, 45 DCR 4045
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-308, § 2(b), 60 DCR 3386
1981 Ed., § 1-786.3.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-308 rewrote the section, which read: “Benefits of the retirement programs provided for herein shall not be assigned or alienated, except to the extent expressly permitted by this chapter or by another applicable law.”
Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 19-309 rewrote this section to read as follows:
“Benefits of the retirement programs provided for in this act shall not be assigned or alienated, except to the extent expressly permitted by this act or by another applicable law and with respect to a domestic relations order that substantially meets all of the requirements of section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code, as determined solely by the Retirement Board.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-309 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Police Officers, Fire Fighters, and Teachers Retirement Benefit Replacement Act of 1998 Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-583, December 22, 2012, 60 DCR 132).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Police, Fire Fighters, Teachers Retirement Benefit Replacement Act of 1998 Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-35, March 19, 2013, 60 DCR 4646, 20 DCSTAT 508).
Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.